Utah statutes.
20A-16-410.   Confirmation of receipt of application and voted ballot.

The lieutenant governor, in coordination with an election officer, shall implement an electronic free-access system by which a covered voter may determine by telephone, electronic mail, or Internet:

(1)  whether the voter's federal postcard application or other registration or military-overseas ballot application has been received and accepted;

(2)  whether the voter's military-overseas ballot has been received; and

(3)  the current status of the ballot.

